hu: Fedél konfigurációja: Félvér / hibrid; Monoszárny; Dupla nyeregszárny; Egyéb
cs: Uspořádání klapek: Křížené/hybridní; Monoflap (jedna bočnice); Dvojitá bočnice; Jiné
en: Flap configuration: Half-breed/hybrid; Monoflap; Twin flap (double flap); Other
ro-RO: Configurația clapetei: Hibrid/half-breed; Cu o singură aripă (monoflap); Cu aripă dublă; Altele
vi: Cấu hình nắp đậy: Lai/hỗn hợp; Vạt đơn; Vạt kép (vạt đôi); Khác
bg-BG: Конфигурация на седловите крила: Хибридна; Моно крило; Двойно крило; Друго
el: Διαμόρφωση πτερυγίου: Ημίαιμο/υβριδικό; Monoflap (μονό πτερύγιο); Διπλό πτερύγιο (twin flap); Άλλο
th: รูปแบบของปีกอาน: ลูกผสม/ไฮบริด; ปีกอานชั้นเดียว; ปีกอานคู่; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Configuração da aba: Misto/híbrido; Aba simples; Aba dupla; Outro
tr: Kapak düzeni: Melez/hibrit; Tek kanat; İkiz kanat (çift kanat); Diğer
nb: Flappekonfigurasjon: Kombinert/hybrid; Monoflap; Dobbel klaff; Annet
pl: Konfiguracja klapek: Hybrydowa; Monoflap (pojedyncza tybinka); Dwie tybinki (standard); Inna
fr: Configuration des volets: Half-breed/hybride; Monoquartier; Double quartier; Autre
pt-BR: Configuração da aba: Misto/híbrido; Aba única; Aba dupla; Outros
ru: Конфигурация клапанов: Гибридное; Монокрыло; Двойное крыло; Другое
fi: Läpän konfiguraatio: Half-breed/hybridi; Yksisiipinen; Kaksisiipinen; Muu
hr-HR: Konfiguracija preklopa: Kombinirana / hibridna; Jednostruko krilce; Dvostruko krilce; Ostalo
ko: 플랩 구성: 하프 브리드/하이브리드; 모노플랩; 트윈 플랩(더블 플랩); 기타
da: Konfiguration af flap: Half-breed/hybrid; Monoklap; Dobbeltklap (twin flap); Andet
de: Blattkonfiguration: Half-Breed/Hybrid; Monoblatt; Doppelblatt; Sonstige
zh-CN: 鞍翼配置: 混合型; 单翼; 双翼（双层）; 其他
ja: フラップ構造: ハーフブリード/ハイブリッド; モノフラップ; ツインフラップ (ダブルフラップ); その他
lt-LT: Skverno konfigūracija: Pusiau hibridinis / hibridinis; Vieno atvarto; Dviejų atvartų (dvigubas atvartas); Kita
sv: Utformning av flärp: Half-breed/hybrid; Enkelkåpa; Dubbelkåpa; Övrigt
it: Configurazione del lembo: Half-breed/ibrida; Monoquartiere; Doppio quartiere; Altro
sl-SI: Konfiguracija poklopcev: Polovični/hibridni; Enojni zavihek; Dvojni zavihek; Drugo
zh-TW: 翻蓋配置: 混合型; 單片鞍翼; 雙片鞍翼 (雙層鞍翼); 其他
nl: Zadelbladconfiguratie: Half-breed/hybride; Monoflap; Twin flap (dubbele flap); Overige
es: Configuración de solapa: Media raza/híbrida; Monofaldón; Faldón doble; Otro
sk-SK: Konfigurácia klapiek: Zmiešaná/hybridná; Jednoduchá bočnica; Dvojitá bočnica; Iné